North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-38 Anhydrous Ammonia Risk Management

Source:

S.L. 2017, sb2027, § 7, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-38-01.
Risk management program — Anhydrous ammonia.

To determine compliance with the risk management program requirements set forth in section 112 of the Clean Air Act of 1990 [42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq.], as amended through June 30, 2011, the agriculture commissioner may:

Request information from any person that:

Sells, stores, or handles anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes; and

Is required to comply with the risk management program requirements;

Conduct inspections of any person that:

Sells, stores, or handles anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes; and

Is required to comply with the risk management program requirements; and

Obtain and review risk management plans required under 40 Code of Federal Regulations, part 68, as amended through June 30, 2011, and other records applicable to any person that:

Sells, stores, or handles anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes; and

Is required to comply with the risk management program requirements.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 7, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-38-02.
Risk management program — Enforcement authority.

If the agriculture commissioner determines there is noncompliance on the part of any person that sells, stores, or handles anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes and that is required to comply with the risk management program requirements referenced in section 4.1-38-01, the agriculture commissioner may:

Bring an action to enjoin a violation or a threatened violation;

Issue a cease and desist order; and

Impose a civil penalty through an administrative hearing in an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars per day for each violation.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 7, effective July 1, 2017.